Massachusetts, session 194th, H1728.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 13K of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(g) Whenever any person has been convicted of subsections (a½) to (e), inclusive, when
the victim of such crime is an elder or a person residing in senior housing, the person convicted
shall register annually for 5 consecutive years with the office of probation, which shall maintain
a central registry of all such persons. The registration shall include (i) the offender’s home
address and any secondary addresses; (ii) the offender’s work address; (iii) the offender’s age,
sex, race, height, weight, eye and hair color; (iv) a photograph of the offender; and (v) whether
the offender is in compliance with the registration requirement of this subsection. Whoever fails
to register as required by this subsection shall be punished by imprisonment in the house of
of 2

correction for not more than 2½ years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both such fine
and imprisonment.
of 2